Maine, session 132, LD1922.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4008-B is enacted to read:
§4008-B. Sealing reports
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Sealing records" means sealing records so that the records are rendered
inaccessible to the public but are retained by the department for internal use, such as
compliance with legal obligations, future child protective investigations or other
legitimate governmental purposes.
B. "Serious physical injury" includes, but is not limited to:
(1) Broken bones or fractures;
(2) Adult-sized human bites;
(3) Cases involving children who have been tortured, tied or confined;
(4) Suspicious burns or head injuries or significant injuries with an implausible
explanation; or
(5) A physical injury that:
(a) Creates a substantial risk of death;
(b) Causes serious and protracted impairment of health; or
(c) Causes protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily organ and
requires surgical procedures.
2. Sealing of child protection records. The following provisions govern the sealing
of child protection records.
A. The department shall seal the records of an unsubstantiated or indicated report
immediately upon such classification by the department. The records of an
unsubstantiated or indicated report remain sealed unless a subsequent substantiated or
indicated report involving the individual identified as responsible or possibly
responsible for the alleged abuse or neglect is recorded during the one-year period after
the records were sealed.
B. The department shall seal the records of a substantiated report:
Page 1 - 132LR1124(01)

(1) If the child was not removed from the child's home by the department, 3 years
after the date the report was entered, as long as a subsequent substantiated or
indicated report involving the individual identified as responsible for the abuse or
neglect has not been recorded during that 3-year period; or
(2) If the child was removed from the child's home by the department, 3 years
from the date the child was removed in a case in which a court made a finding that
the child was abused or neglected or 5 years from the date the substantiated report
was entered, whichever occurs first, as long as a subsequent substantiated or
indicated report involving the individual identified as responsible for the abuse or
neglect has not been recorded.
C. If, during the time a prior substantiated or indicated report is recorded, a subsequent
substantiated or indicated report involving the same individual is entered, the records
of the prior report may not be sealed until the records of the subsequent report are
eligible for sealing under this section.
D. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, the records of a substantiated report involving the following may not
be sealed:
(1) A child fatality;
(2) Sexual abuse;
(3) Sex trafficking; or
(4) Serious physical injury.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.